Illinois, session 104th, SB520.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Commission on Equity and Inclusion Act is 5amended by changing Section 40-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 574/40-1)7    Sec. 40-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Commission on Equity and Inclusion Act. References in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 1-1-22; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21.)